Hawaii statutes.
§486-71 Definitions. For the purposes
of this part:

"Odometer" is an analog or digital
measuring device that reflects distance traveled.

"Passenger car" means a vehicle with
self-contained motive power and seating capacity for up to twelve passengers (excluding
the driver), not exceeding 16,000 pounds gross vehicle weight. [L 1988, c 156,
pt of §3; am L 1991, c 153, §22]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next